Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska85-3113
Repayment tracking.

The commission has the administrative responsibility to track borrowers and to develop repayment tracking and collection mechanisms for the Attracting Excellence to Teaching Program and the Enhancing Excellence in Teaching Program. The commission may contract for such services. When a loan has been forgiven pursuant to section 85-3106 or 85-3110, the amount forgiven may be taxable income to the borrower and the commission shall provide notification of the amount forgiven to the borrower, the Department of Revenue, and the United States Internal Revenue Service if required by the Internal Revenue Code.

Laws 2000, LB 1399, § 21;

Laws 2009, LB547, § 13;

R.S.1943, (2014), § 79-8,138;

Laws 2023, LB705, § 25.